Missouri, session 2026, SB1116.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 640, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
three new sections, to be known as sections 640.800, 640.801,
and 640.802, to read as follows:
640.800. 1. Sections 640.800 to 640.802 shall be
known and may be cited as the "Missouri Nuclear Energy
Advancement Act."
2. As used in sections 640.801 and 640.802, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Advanced nuclear reactor", a range of nuclear
reactor technologies determined by the United States Nuclear
Regulatory Commission to be either of generation III+ or
generation IV nuclear reactors, including large light water
reactors, small modular reactors, microreactors, and nuclear
cogeneration;
(2) "Director", the director of the Missouri advanced
nuclear energy office;
(3) "Eligible nuclear project", a new electric
generation project located in the state involving the
development of a natural gas electric generation facility
with an advanced nuclear reactor;

SB 1116 2
(4) "Fund", the Missouri advanced nuclear development
fund, established under section 640.802;
(5) "Office", the Missouri advanced nuclear energy
office, established under section 640.801;
(6) "Rate-based recovery", the recovery by a public
utility, as defined in section 386.020, of the utility's
capital and operating costs for a project through inclusion
of such costs in the utility's rate base.
3. There shall be no prohibition on the construction
or operation of nuclear electric generation facilities in
the state, provided that all licensing requirements of the
facilities have been satisfied and the state's emergency
preparedness for nuclear electric generation is considered
to be in good standing by the Missouri state emergency
management agency.
640.801. 1. The governor shall establish the Missouri
advanced nuclear energy office within the department of
natural resources to be headed by a director appointed by
the governor. The director shall not have any direct or
indirect interests that substantially conflict with the
director's duties as the head of the office. The director
may hire additional staff as necessary to implement the
duties of the office under this section, subject to the
availability of funds under this section.
2. The annual budget of the office shall not exceed
seven hundred and fifty thousand dollars.
3. The office shall administer the Missouri advanced
nuclear development fund established under section 640.802.
4. The duties of the office include:
(1) Solicitation of gifts, grants, tax credits, or
donations to the fund for the purpose of providing grants to
eligible nuclear projects in the state;

SB 1116 3
(2) Establishing procedures and guidelines for the
application, review, approval, and monitoring of grants;
(3) Ensuring all grants are awarded in a fair,
equitable, and transparent manner;
(4) Requiring appropriate reporting and accountability
from all recipients of grants for failure to meet
established goals;
(5) Entering into written agreements with recipients
of grants under this section before awarding such grants;
(6) Creating specific goals for the completion of
projects for which grants are awarded;
(7) Providing recipients terms of repayment of grants
for failure to reach specific goals for each project for
which a grant is awarded;
(8) Evaluate each grant application based on the
applicant's:
(a) Efficiency of operations to complete a project for
which a grant is to be awarded;
(b) Availability of resources essential for completing
a project for which a grant is requested;
(c) Ability to repay a grant if project goals are not
met; and
(d) The project's potential benefit to the state.
5. The office may provide a reimbursement grant from
the fund for expenses associated with the construction of an
eligible nuclear project in the state if such expenses are
limited to:
(1) Site planning, including conceptual site-specific
engineering studies;
(2) Front-end engineering design;
(3) Identifying potential environmental hazards from a
project for which a grant is awarded;

SB 1116 4
(4) Any work done in preparation of the construction
permit or license application to state, local, or federal
agencies;
(5) Nuclear Regulatory Commission licensing fees;
(6) Procurement and development of long-lead
components; or
(7) Construction activities, including the
manufacture, fabrication, quality assurance, placement,
erection, installation, modification, inspection, or testing
of an eligible nuclear project.
6. The director shall:
(1) Report any actual or potential conflicts of
interest, or the appearance thereof, to the governor's
general counsel and the Missouri ethics commission; and
(2) Annually submit to the lieutenant governor and the
general assembly a report documenting each grant awarded
under this section, including metrics indicating the
performance of each project for which a grant was awarded,
if such information is available at the time of reporting.
7. No grant under this section shall exceed one
hundred million dollars.
8. Grants under this section shall not be used for
projects where costs are recovered through rate-based
recovery.
9. For a project involving the commission of an
advanced nuclear reactor, the office shall require that,
until the advanced nuclear reactor is commissioned, the net
proceeds from the grant recipient's sales of electricity
from a natural gas electric generation facility shall be
dedicated to funding the pre-commissioning costs of the
advanced nuclear reactor portion of such project, including,

SB 1116 5
but not limited to, costs for siting, development,
permitting, design, engineering, and construction.
10. Information submitted to the office in an
application for a grant under this section shall be
considered confidential and shall remain confidential and
shall not be released by the office to the public or
disclosed in response to any request, including a records
request under chapter 610.
640.802. There is hereby created in the state treasury
the "Missouri advanced nuclear development fund", which
shall consist of gifts, grants, tax credits, or donations
solicited by the Missouri advanced nuclear energy office,
established under section 640.801. The state treasurer
shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections
30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve
disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and money
in the fund shall be used solely by the office for the
purposes of providing grants to eligible nuclear energy
projects. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end
of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund. The state treasurer shall invest
moneys in the fund in the same manner as other funds are
invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such
investments shall be credited to the fund.
✓